Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-534
Payment for grain; when.

Payment to the seller for grain purchased by a warehouse licensee shall be made upon demand by the seller except as otherwise provided by written or oral contract between the parties.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 10.